Tennessee, session 114, HB1740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1402(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) "Eligible student" means a resident of this state who:
(A)
(i) Is a child with any of the following disabilities as defined by the
state board of education pursuant to § 49-10-102:
(a) Autism;
(b) Deaf-blindness;
(c) Hearing impairments;
(d) Intellectual disability;
(e) Orthopedic impairments;
(f) Traumatic brain injury;
(g) Visual impairments;
(h) Developmental delay;
(i) Multiple disabilities;
(j) A specific learning disability; or
(k) Deafness;
(ii) Has an active individualized education program (IEP) in
accordance with 34 C.F.R. § 300 et seq., § 49-10-102, and regulations of
the state board of education with one (1) of the disabilities pursuant to
HB1740
011493
- 1 -

subdivision (3)(A)(i) as the primary or secondary disability in effect at the
time the department receives the request for participation in the program;
and
(iii) Meets at least one (1) of the following requirements:
(a) Was previously enrolled in and attended a Tennessee
public school for the one (1) full school year immediately
preceding the school year in which the student receives an
individualized education account (IEA);
(b) Is enrolling in a Tennessee school for the first time; or
(c) Received an individualized education account (IEA) in
the previous school year; or
(B)
(i) Is a child with a medical condition that inhibits the child from
attending school in person, as determined by the state board of
education; and
(ii) Is entitled to attend a public school;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1402(6), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(6) "Participating school" means:
(A) A nonpublic school that meets the requirements established in this
part and seeks to enroll eligible students; or
(B) For an eligible student, as defined in subdivision (3)(B), a home
school, as defined in § 49-6-3050(a)(1);
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1404, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
- 2 - 011493

(d) This section does not apply to an eligible student, as defined in § 49-10-
1402(3)(B), or a participating school, as defined in § 49-10-1402(6)(B).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1403(d), is amended by
adding ", as defined in § 49-10-1402(6)(A)," after "A participating school".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1405(a)(7), is amended by
adding ", as defined in § 49-10-1402(6)(A)," after "of participating schools".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 10, Part 14, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A parent of an eligible student, as defined in § 49-10-1402(3)(B), shall ensure
that funds in an IEA are used only for approved expenses listed in § 49-10-1403(b).
(b) The department shall create and implement a process to ensure that funds in
an IEA for an eligible student, as defined in § 49-10-1402(3)(B), are regularly monitored
to ensure compliance with this section and § 49-10-1403(b).
(c) The department may suspend or terminate an eligible student from
participating in the program, if the department determines that the parent has failed to
comply with the requirements of this section. If the department terminates an eligible
student's participation in the program pursuant to this subsection (c), then the student is
ineligible from participating in the program in the future.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011493